bezhta_adv.lexd
PATTERNS 
Adverb [<adv>:] > Infl[-erg]
Adverb Infl |(Essive Directive? (Lative|Ablative|Translative)?)
Adverb Infl[gen2] Essive (Lative|Ablative)?
Adverb Essive Infl[gen2] (Lative|Ablative)?

Class Adverb[cl]
